California statutes. Public Resources Code
(4) (A) The Governor may certify a project as a water-related project for purposes of this chapter if the project meets the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 21189.81.

(B) In addition to subparagraph (A), the Governor shall ensure all of the following:

(i) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of the trial court and the court of appeal in hearing and deciding any case challenging a lead agency’s action on a certified project under this division, including payment of the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner as provided in the rule of court adopted by the Judicial Council under Section 21189.85.

(ii) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with the review and consideration of the project under this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.

(iii) For a project for which environmental review has commenced, the
 applicant demonstrates that the record of proceedings is being prepared in accordance with Section 21189.86.

(C) In addition to subparagraphs (A) and (B), the Governor
 may certify a project as a water-related project for purposes of this chapter only if the Governor finds that greenhouse gas emissions resulting from the project will be mitigated to the extent feasible.

(b) The Office of Planning and Research may consult with other state agencies on and may issue guidelines regarding applications for and the certification of projects under this chapter. Any guidelines issued under this subdivision are not subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) An applicant for certification of an infrastructure project under this chapter shall do all of the following:

(1) Avoid or minimize significant environmental impacts in any disadvantaged community.

(2) If measures are required pursuant to this division to mitigate significant environmental impacts in a disadvantaged community, mitigate those impacts consistent with this division, including Section 21002. Mitigation measures required under this subdivision shall be undertaken in, and directly benefit, the affected community.

(3) Enter into a binding and enforceable agreement to comply with this subdivision in its application to the Governor and to the lead agency prior to the agency’s certification of the environmental impact report for the project. 

(d) The Office
 of Planning and Research shall make evidence and materials submitted for the certification of a project available to the public on its internet website at least 15 days before the certification of the project.

(e) The Governor’s decision to certify a project shall not be subject to judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.83.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 21189.82, with respect to any energy infrastructure project or semiconductor or microelectronic project proposed by a private entity, the Governor may certify the project pursuant to this chapter only if the project does not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, including greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation. For purposes of this section, a project is deemed to meet the requirements of this section if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Governor that the applicant has a binding commitment that it will mitigate impacts resulting from the emission of greenhouse gases, if any, in accordance with Section 21183.6.

(b) In addition to the requirements of Section 21189.82, with respect to any transportation-related project, the Governor may certify the project pursuant to this chapter only if the project does not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, excluding greenhouse gas emissions from employee transportation. For purposes of this section, a project is deemed to meet the requirements of this section if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Governor that the applicant has a binding commitment that it will mitigate impacts resulting from the emission of greenhouse gases, if any, preferably through direct emissions reductions where feasible, but where not feasible, then through the use of offsets that are real, permanent, verifiable, and enforceable, and that provide a specific, quantifiable, and direct environmental
 and public health benefit to the same air pollution control district or air quality management district in which the project is located, but if all of the project impacts cannot be feasibly and fully mitigated in the same air pollution control district or air quality management district, then remaining unmitigated impacts shall be mitigated through the use of offsets that provide a specific, quantifiable, and direct environmental and public health benefit to the region in which the project is located.

(c) The applicant shall be responsible for the costs of preparing an analysis of the emission of greenhouse gases resulting from the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.84.

(a) This chapter applies to a project that is certified by the Governor as an infrastructure project.

(b) An applicant may apply to the Governor for certification and shall provide evidence and materials deemed necessary by the Governor in making a decision on the application for certification.

(c) The Governor shall submit the Governor’s proposed certification, and any supporting information, to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review and concurrence or nonconcurrence. Within 30 days of receiving the determination, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee shall concur or nonconcur in
 writing on the certification. If the Joint Legislative Budget Committee fails to concur or nonconcur on a certification within 30 days of the submittal, the project is deemed to be certified.

(d) The Office of Planning and Research may charge a fee to an applicant seeking certification under this chapter for the costs incurred by the Governor’s office in implementing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.85.

(a) An action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report for an infrastructure project subject to this chapter or the granting of any project approvals, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, shall be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court.

(b) On or before December 31, 2023, the Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.86.

Notwithstanding any other law, the preparation and certification of the record of proceedings for an infrastructure project shall be performed in the following manner:

(a) The lead agency for the project shall prepare the record of proceedings under this division concurrently with the administrative process.

(b) All documents and other materials placed in the record of proceedings shall be posted on, and be downloadable from, an internet website maintained by the lead agency commencing with the date of the release of
 the draft environmental impact report.

(c) The lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental impact report and all other documents submitted to, or relied on by, the lead agency in preparing the draft environmental impact report.

(d) Any document prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the applicant after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report that is a part of the record of proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days after the document is released or received by the lead agency.

(e) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any comment available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days of its receipt.

(f) Within seven days after the receipt of any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the project and are copyright protected are
 not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright-protected documents, the lead agency shall make an index of these documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, or within five days if the document is received or relied on by the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index shall specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(h) The lead agency shall certify the final record of proceedings within five days of its approval of the project.

(i) Any dispute arising from the record of proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record of proceedings shall file a motion to augment the record of proceedings at the time it files its initial brief.

(j) The contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(k) The applicant shall pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with review and consideration of the project under this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project. The cost of preparing the record
 of proceedings for the project shall not be recoverable from the plaintiff or petitioner before, during, or after any litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.87.

(a) Within 10 days of the certification of a project pursuant to Section 21189.82, the lead agency shall, at the applicant’s expense, if applicable, issue a public notice in no less than 12-point type stating the following:

“THE APPLICANT HAS ELECTED TO PROCEED UNDER CHAPTER 7 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21189.80) OF DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH PROVIDES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THAT ANY JUDICIAL ACTION CHALLENGING THE CERTIFICATION OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT (EIR) OR THE APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT DESCRIBED IN THE EIR IS SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN SECTIONS 21189.85 AND 21189.86
 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE. A COPY OF CHAPTER 7 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21189.80) OF
 DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS INCLUDED BELOW.”

(b) The public notice shall be distributed by the lead agency as required for public notices issued under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 21092.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.88.

Except as otherwise provided expressly in this chapter, this chapter does not affect the duty of any party to comply with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.89.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.90.

If before January 1, 2033, a lead agency fails to approve an infrastructure project, then the certification is no longer valid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.91.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 7, commencing with Section 21189.80.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13.5. CALIFORNIA ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION PROGRAM [21190. - 21194.]

21190.

There is in this state the California Environmental Protection Program, which shall be concerned with the preservation and protection of California’s environment. In this connection, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that, since the inception of the program pursuant to the Marks-Badham Environmental Protection and Research Act, the Department of Motor Vehicles has, in the course of issuing environmental license plates, consistently informed potential purchasers of those plates, by means of a detailed brochure, of the manner in which the program functions, the particular purposes for which revenues from the issuance of those plates can lawfully be expended, and examples of particular projects and programs that have been financed by those revenues. Therefore, because of this representation by the
 Department of Motor Vehicles, purchasers expect and rely that the moneys paid by them will be expended only for those particular purposes, which results in an obligation on the part of the state to expend the revenues only for those particular purposes.

Accordingly, all funds expended pursuant to this division shall be used only to support identifiable projects and programs of state agencies, cities, cities and counties, counties, districts, the University of California, private nonprofit environmental and land acquisition organizations, and private research organizations that have a clearly defined benefit to the people of the State of California and that have one or more of the following purposes:

(a) The control and abatement of air pollution, including all phases of research into the sources, dynamics, and effects of environmental pollutants.

(b) The acquisition, preservation, restoration, or any combination thereof, of natural areas or ecological reserves.

(c) Environmental education, including formal school programs and informal public education programs. The State Department of Education may administer moneys appropriated for these programs, but shall distribute not less than 90 percent of moneys appropriated for the purposes of this subdivision to fund environmental education programs of school districts, other local schools, state agencies other than the State Department of Education, and community organizations. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated for environmental education may be used for State Department of Education programs or defraying administrative costs.

(d) Protection of nongame species and threatened and endangered plants and animals.

(e) Protection, enhancement, and restoration of fish and wildlife habitat and related water quality, including review of the potential impact of development activities and land use changes on that habitat.

(f) The purchase, on an opportunity basis, of real property consisting of sensitive natural areas for the state park system and for local and regional parks, and deferred maintenance projects at state parks.

(g) Reduction or minimization of the effects of soil erosion and the discharge of sediment into the waters of the Lake Tahoe region, including the restoration of disturbed wetlands and stream environment zones, through projects by the California Tahoe Conservancy and grants to local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, and nonprofit organizations.

(h) Scientific research on the risks to California’s natural resources and communities caused by the impacts of climate change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 33.   (SB 83)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21190.5.

(a) In addition to, and in furtherance of, the purposes specified in subdivisions (a), (b), (d), and (e) of Section 21190, money in the California Environmental License Plate Fund may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to the California Ocean Protection Act (Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 35500)).

(b) This section shall become operative only if the California Ocean Protection Act is enacted during the 2003–04 Regular Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Note: Condition in subd. (b) was satisfied by Stats. 2004, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

21191.

(a) The California Environmental License Plate Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, and consists of the moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to any law. The annual fee for environmental license plates is fifty-three dollars ($53) for the issuance or forty-three dollars ($43) for the renewal of the plates.

(b) The Controller shall transfer from the California Environmental License Plate Fund to the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund the amount appropriated by the Legislature for the reimbursement of costs incurred by the Department of Motor Vehicles in performing its duties pursuant to Sections 5004, 5004.5, and 5022 and Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 5100) of Chapter 1
 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code. The reimbursement from the California Environmental License Plate Fund shall only include those additional costs that are directly attributable to any additional duties or special handling necessary for the issuance, renewal, or retention of the environmental license plates.

(c) The Controller shall transfer to the post fund of the Veterans’ Home of California, established pursuant to Section 1047 of the Military and Veterans Code, all revenue derived from the issuance of prisoner of war special license plates pursuant to Section 5101.5 of the Vehicle Code less the administrative costs of the Department of Motor Vehicles incurred in issuing and renewing those plates.

(d) The Director of Motor Vehicles shall certify the amounts of the administrative costs of the Department of Motor Vehicles in subdivision (c) to the Controller.

(e) The balance of the moneys in the California Environmental License Plate Fund shall be available for expenditure only for the exclusive trust purposes specified in Section 21190, upon appropriation by the Legislature. However, all moneys derived from the issuance of commemorative 1984 Olympic reflectorized license plates in the California Environmental License Plate Fund shall be used only for capital outlay purposes.

(f) All proposed appropriations for the California Environmental Protection Program shall be summarized in a section in the Governor’s Budget for each fiscal year and shall bear the caption “California Environmental Protection Program.” The section shall contain a separate description of each project for which an appropriation is made. Each of these appropriations shall be made to the department performing the project and accounted for separately.

(g) The budget the Governor presents to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution shall include, as proposed appropriations for the California Environmental Protection Program, only projects and programs recommended for funding by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21193. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall consult with the Secretary for Environmental Protection before making any recommendations to fund projects pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21190.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 36) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 36.5.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21192.

The funds provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 21191 may be used in a manner which will allow the state to qualify for any funds which may be available from any source for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

21193.

(a) The program established by this division shall be administered by the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(b) On or before November 1 of each year, the secretary shall forward those projects and programs recommended for funding to the Governor for inclusion in the Governor’s Budget, together with a statement of the purpose of each project and program, the benefits to be realized, and the secretary’s comments thereon.

(c) The section of the Governor’s Budget for the California Environmental Protection Program shall include a display of expenditures that includes a statement of the purpose and benefits to be realized for each project or program proposed for funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 540, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21193.5.

Concurrently with the submittal of the Governor’s Budget for the 2006–07 fiscal year and every third fiscal year thereafter, the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on how the particular mix of funding sources, from the California Environmental License Plate Fund and other funds, is appropriate for each project or program in relationship to the benefits realized from the project or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 540, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21194.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any funds appropriated from the California Environmental License Plate Fund for the construction of a visitor center at Buena Vista Lagoon may be used to reimburse the City of Oceanside for any funds that the city has advanced for that project construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. THE VENTURA-LOS ANGELES MOUNTAIN AND COASTAL STUDY COMMISSION [22000. - 22080.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations of Policy [22000. - 22002.]

22000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Ventura-Los Angeles Mountain and Coastal Zone, defined in Section 22012, as the last large undeveloped area contiguous to the shoreline within the greater Los Angeles Metropolitan Region, comprised of Los Angeles and Ventura Counties, represents a unique and irreplaceable natural resource to the people of the state, that uses of the zone include recreation, conservation, open space, and utilization and enjoyment of the sea and the mountains, that the zone functions as an integral component of the physical and biological systems of the entire region, and to a significant, although not as yet precisely determined degree, impacts upon these essential life-support systems, that there are pressures of population growth and economic development in the zone, and that if conservation and development practices are permitted to continue in their present unplanned, uncoordinated, and haphazard manner, irreversible deterioration of the zone as a precious natural resource for the people of the entire state may ensue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

The Legislature further finds and declares that current conservation and development practices may conflict with the public interest of present and future generations due to:

(a) An insufficient understanding of the long-range implications of land use practices as they affect the zone and the region.

(b) The uncoordinated and fragmented nature of public and private planning of development and conservation activities within the zone.

(c) The lack of a comprehensive plan and program to provide for conservation and development of the zone in the best public interest.

(d) The fact that no governmental mechanism exists for studying and evaluating individual projects as to their effect on the entire zone and region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in order to protect and advance the interests of the present and future generations in the zone and region, there is need to create a Ventura-Los Angeles Mountain and Coastal Study Commission to study the entire zone as well as the relationship of the zone to the region, to ascertain what is needed for balanced conservation and development, to determine a set of policies and priorities based on such studies, and to propose further legislative action to provide for implementation of these policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [22010. - 22014.]

22010.

Unless context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22011.

“Commission” means the Ventura-Los Angeles Mountain and Coastal Study Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22012.

“Zone” means: (1) the Ventura-Los Angeles Mountain and Coastal Zone which includes the land and water area of the Greater Los Angeles Metropolitan Region, comprised of Los Angeles and Ventura Counties, seaward to the outermost limit of the state’s jurisdiction, landward to the Ventura Freeway (Route 101) between Calleguas Creek on the west, and an eastward boundary following Sunset Boulevard from its intersection with the Pacific Coast Highway (Route 1) on the south, northward and eastward to the city line of Beverly Hills, thence following the northerly boundary of the City of Beverly Hills until it returns to Sunset Boulevard, thence eastward on Sunset Boulevard to its intersection with Harper Avenue, thence following a direct line from this point to the southernmost point of Griffith Park, thence following the Griffith Park boundary eastward, then northward, then westward to its point of intersection with the Ventura Freeway; and (2) the area commonly known as the Elysian Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22013.

“Region” means the Greater Los Angeles Metropolitan Region, comprised of Los Angeles and Ventura Counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22014.

“Irreversible modification” means any modification that affects the physical shape, function, or environment of any estuary, watershed, flood plain, or park and recreation area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Organization and Membership [22020. - 22026.]

22020.

There is in the state government a Ventura-Los Angeles Mountain and Coastal Study Commission, consisting of 15 members:

(a) The Secretary of the Resources Agency or his deputy.

(b) The Planning Officer of the State Office of Planning or his deputy.

(c) One member of the State Lands Commission, selected by the State Lands Commission.

(d) One member of the Board of Supervisors of Ventura County, selected by such board of supervisors.

(e) One member of the Board of Supervisors of Los Angeles County, selected by such board of supervisors.

(f) One member of the Los Angeles City Council, selected by such city council.

(g) One member representing the Southern California Association of Governments selected by the executive committee of such association.

(h) Eight members of the public, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, who shall be residents of the region and who shall have special knowledge or experience in the fields of conservation, parks and recreation, real estate and development, planning, public health, air pollution, water quality, and economics. There shall be balanced representation between conservation and user interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22021.

The members of the commission shall serve at the pleasure of their respective appointing powers. The members shall serve without compensation, but each of the members shall be reimbursed for his actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22022.

(a) The commission shall meet twice a month, and may meet in subcommittee with authority to conduct hearings within special areas of interest. The public shall be given reasonable prior notice of the time and place of commission meetings, and all such meetings shall be open to the public.

(b) All meetings of the commission shall be held at a place reasonably convenient to its members and the public in a meeting room that affords adequate space for its members, its staff, the news media, and the public that may reasonably be expected to attend the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22023.

The time and place of the first meeting of the commission shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Resources Agency, but in no event shall it be scheduled for a date later than February 1, 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22024.

The commission shall select from among its members a chair and a vice chair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 17.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22025.

All vacancies in the commission membership shall be filled in the same manner in which original appointments were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22026.

The commission shall appoint a director who shall have charge of coordinating and administering the affairs of the commission, subject to the direction and policies of the commission. The director shall, subject to approval of the commission, appoint such employees as may be necessary in order to carry out the functions of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties [22050. - 22057.]

22050.

The commission may:

(a) For purposes of this division, accept any gifts, donations, or bequests from individuals or organizations, or accept grants of funds from private or public agencies.

(b) Appoint committees from its membershp.

(c) Contract for or employ any professional services required by the commission or for the performance of services which in its opinion cannot satisfactorily be performed by its officers and employees or provided by other federal, state, or local governmental agencies.

(d) Do any and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22051.

Within nine months of the first meeting of the commission, the commission shall make a detailed study of all factors that may significantly affect or cause irreversible modification of the present and future status of the zone and its relationship with the region, and any other factors, including, but not limited to:

(a) The zone as an airshed resource for the region, considering climatology and meteorology.

(b) Open space, including scenic easements, parks, and natural preserves, and fire hazards and fire prevention.

(c) Watersheds, floods, and flood damage prevention.

(d) Beaches, estuaries, lagoons, coastal bluffs, springs, creeks, lakes, fish, wildlife, and natural plantlife of the zone and the effects of development thereon.

(e) Recreation, including beaches, parks, and other facilities for sport fishing, surfing, pleasure boating, picnicking, camping, mountaineering, hiking, and horseback riding.

(f) Inventory of Indian settlements and other historical and archeological sites, fossil beds, unusual plantlife, and geological formations for possible future preservation and utilization.

(g) Water supply, water quality, and waste disposal, including sewage plants and outfalls and thermal and radioactive pollution.

(h) Solid waste disposal, including the effect of sanitary landfill activities.

(i) Geology, erosion, soil types, land stability, and grading practices.

(j) Proposed transportation plans, including present and projected traffic patterns, and new methods of solving transportation problems.

(k) Projected population and related housing development within the zone and the impact thereof on the zone and region.

(l) Power and desalination plants.

(m) Exploration and exploitation of oil and gas and other minerals and natural resources.

(n) Present land uses and known proposals for change, including impact of land appraisal and tax policies.

(o) Present ownerships, including the administration of publicly owned properties.

(p) Present regulation of land and water uses and activities of all levels of government.

(q) Present laws affecting the zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22053.

The commission shall analyze the interrelations of the studies prepared pursuant to Section 22051 in order to ascertain what is needed for balanced conservation and development, determine a set of policies and priorities based on this analysis, and prepare a proposal for further legislative action to provide for implementation of these policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22055.

The existence of the commission shall terminate on the 61st day after the final adjournment of the 1972 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22056.

In the preparation of its studies, the commission may ask for current land use information, studies, and plans of cities and counties. Federal governmental agencies are requested to, and state and local governmental agencies shall, comply with the requests of the commission for such information. The commission shall make its studies available to cooperating governmental agencies upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------

22057.

The commission may appoint technical advisory committees, whose members shall serve without compensation, and prescribe their membership, powers, and duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Deferment of Public Works Involving Irreversible Modifications [22080. - 22080.]

22080.

Acquisition of land for, or construction of, all public works projects, by the State of California and state agencies, with a total budget in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) which will cause irreversible modification of the zone are hereby deferred until the 61st day after the final adjournment of the 1972 Regular Session of the Legislature. The provisions of this section shall not apply to districts, agencies, or other governmental entities not primarily supported by an annual appropriation of state funds. All the following projects are excluded from the deferment provided by this section:

(a) Any project funded by state general obligation bonds.

(b) State Highway Routes 5, 101, and 405.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1556.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.5. BLUE RIBBON COMMITTEE FOR THE REHABILITATION OF CLEAR LAKE [22085. - 22092.]

22085.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) According to California census data, Lake County, among the poorest counties in the State of California, is growing at a much slower economic rate than the majority of the state.

(b) Based on the 2016 Lake County Comprehensive Economic Development Strategy, Clear Lake, in Lake County, is one of the top two contributors to the local economy, cited as “the cornerstone of the local visitor and recreation markets,” mainly through boating and bass fishing tourism.

(c) Clear Lake is the oldest species-rich, warm water,
 natural
 lake in North America. The lake contributes to the surrounding ecosystems of native plants and animals, as well as species introduced by the Department of Fish and Wildlife. Clear Lake and the surrounding environment is also a home to endangered and rare animal species.

(d) Clear Lake suffers from numerous environmental hazards that negatively affect the quality of the water and the lake’s fish, including all of the following issues:

(1) The State Water Resources Control Board determined that the amount of mercury found in the lake, caused by runoff, fails to meet environmental standards and is in need of improvement.

(2) The Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment concluded that the fish
 caught in Clear Lake, specifically the bass, are not safe for women and children to eat in abundance, or at all.

(3) The 2016 Lake County Comprehensive Economic Development Strategy reports that the overgrowth of seasonal algae, cyanobacteria, and invasive weeds, such as hydrilla, cause a variety of health and habitat problems for the lake. The abundance of cyanobacteria blooms produce odor and surface scum, alter processed drinking water taste, and sometimes cause toxic conditions for pets, creating a seasonal decrease in tourism and depression in the local economy.

(e) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that would establish the Blue Ribbon Committee for the Rehabilitation of Clear Lake. The committee will spearhead activities aimed at cleaning up the
 lake for environmental gains that will revitalize its regional significance so that it may once again be used for recreational purposes, thus creating jobs and inciting new economic development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (AB 707)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22086.

There is hereby established in the Natural Resources Agency the Blue Ribbon Committee for the Rehabilitation of Clear Lake.
